en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with less than 10% of fruit juice
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits avec moins de 10% de jus

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with less than 10% of fruit juice without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits avec moins de 10% de jus non sucrée avec édulcorants

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with sugar and artificial sweeteners and with less than 10% of fruit juice
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits sucrée avec édulcorants et moins de 10% de jus

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with sugar and less than 10% of fruit juice
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits sucrée avec moins de 10% de jus

en: Carbonated fruit soft drink with less than 10% of fruit juice without sugar and artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson gazeuse aux fruits avec moins de 10% de jus non sucrée sans édulcorant

en: Carbonated soft drinks with tea extract
fr: Boissons gazeuses au thé aromatisées, Boisson gazeuse au thé aromatisée
hu: Szénsavas üdítőital teakivonattal

en: Tonic water
bg: Тоник
de: Tonic Water
eo: Toniko
es: Tónica, Agua tónica
fi: Tonic-vesi
fr: Eau tonique
hr: Tonik voda
hu: Tonik
it: Acqua tonica
ja: トニックウォーター
lt: Tonikas, Tonikai
nl: Tonics, Tonic water
pl: Tonik
ru: Тоник
zh: 通宁水

en: Tonic drink with sugar
fr: Tonic sucré, Bitter sucré

en: Tonic drink without sugar with artificial sweeteners
fr: Tonic non sucré avec édulcorants, Bitter non sucré avec édulcorants

en: Tonic drink with sugar and artificial sweeteners
fr: Tonic sucré avec édulcorants, Bitter sucré avec édulcorants

en: Diet sodas, diet soft drinks
bg: Диетични соди
de: Kalorienarme Erfrischungsgetränke, Kalorienreduzierte Erfrischungsgetränke, Diät-Erfrischungsgetränke
es: Sodas light
fi: dieetti-virvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas light, soda light, sodas édulcorés, sodas avec édulcorants, sodas sans sucres, soda sans sucre, soda allégé en sucre, sodas allégés en sucre
he: משקאות מוגזים דיאטטיים
hr: Dijetalna gazirana pića
hu: Diétás üdítőiatlok, Light üdítőiatlok
it: Bibite gassate dietetiche, Bibite gassate senza zucchero
lt: Dietiniai gaivieji gėrimai
nl: Light frisdranken

en: Light orange soft drinks
de: Kalorienarme Orangenlimonaden, Kalorienreduzierte Orangenlimonaden
fi: Kevytappelsiinivirvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas à l'orange light, soda à l'orange light, soda à la pulpe d'orange light, sodas à la pulpe d'orange light
hr: Svijetlonarančasta bezalkoholna pića
hu: Diétás narancsos üdítőiatlok, Light narancsos üdítőiatlok
it: Aranciate light, Aranciate dietetiche, Bibite gassate dietetiche all'arancia, Bibite gassate dietetiche al gusto di arancia
nl: Light sinaasappelfrisdranken

en: Light lemon soft drinks
de: Kalorienarme Zitronenlimonaden, Kalorienreduzierte Zitronenlimonaden
fr: Sodas au citron light, soda au citron light
hr: Lagana bezalkoholna pića s limunom
hu: Diétás citromos üdítőiatlok, Light citromos üdítőiatlok
it: Bibite gassate dietetiche al limone, Bibite gassate dietetiche al gusto di limone
nl: Light citroenfrisdanken

en: Fruit sodas
de: Fruchtlimonaden
es: Sodas a base de frutas
fi: Hedelmävirvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas aux fruits
hr: Voćno gazirano piće
hu: Szénsavas gyümölcsitalok
it: Bibite gassate alla frutta, Bibite gassate al gusto di frutta
lt: Vaisiniai gaivieji gėrimai
nl: Vruchtenfrisdranken
pl: Oranżady owocowe
ro: Băuturi carbogazoase cu fructe, Bauturi carbogazoase cu fructe, Băuturi carbogazoase din fructe, Bauturi carbogazoase din fructe
tr: Meyveli gazoz, Meyveli soda
zh: 水果汽水

en: Light fruit sodas
de: Kalorienarme Fruchtlimonaden, Kalorienreduzierte Fruchtlimonaden
fi: Kevyet hedelmävirvoitusjuomat
fr: Sodas aux fruits light, soda aux fruits light
hr: Lagano voćno gazirano piće
hu: Diétás szénsavas gyümölcsitalok
it: Bibite gassate dietetiche alla frutta, Bibite gassate dietetiche al gusto di frutta
lt: Lengvieji vaisiniai gaivieji gėrimai
nl: Light vruchtenfrisdranken

en: Diet cola soft drink, Cola without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
de: Kalorienarme Colas, Kalorienreduzierte Colas, Light Colas
es: Bebida de cola light
fi: Dieettikola
fr: Sodas au cola light, colas light, cola light, Cola non sucré avec édulcorants
hr: Dijetalno bezalkoholno piće kola
hu: Diétás kóla, Diétás cola, Cola light
it: Cole dietetiche, Bibite gassate dietetiche al gusto di cola, Cola dietetica, Cola light, Cole light
ja: ダイエットコーラ
lt: Dietinė kola, Kola be cukraus
nl: Light cola's
ro: Cola light

en: Sugar-free colas with artificial sweeteners and without caffeine
fr: Colas non sucrés avec édulcorants sans caféine
hr: Cole bez šećera s umjetnim sladilima i bez kofeina
nl: Colas (zonder suiker en caffeine)

de: Cola Mix, Cola-Mix, Cola-Mischgetränk, Spezi
xx: Spezi

en: Apple soft drinks, Apple sodas
de: Apfellimonaden
es: Sodas a base de manzana, Sodas de manzana
fr: Sodas à la pomme, sodas aux pommes, soda à la pomme
hr: Bezalkoholna pića od jabuke
hu: Almás üdítőiatlok, Alma üdítők
it: Bibite gassate alla mela, Bibite gassate al gusto di mela
lt: Obuolių gaivieji gėrimai, Gazuotas obuolių gaivusis gėrimas
nl: Appelfrisdranken

en: Blackcurrant soft drinks
hr: Bezalkoholna pića od crnog ribiza
lt: Juodųjų serbentų gaivieji gėrimai
nl: Cassisfrisdranken